Washington statutes.
RCW 36.87.040

Engineer's report.

When directed by the board the county road engineer shall examine any county road or portion thereof proposed to be vacated and abandoned and report his or her opinion as to whether the county road should be vacated and abandoned, whether the same is in use or has been in use, the condition of the road, whether it will be advisable to preserve it for the county road system in the future, whether the public will be benefited by the vacation and abandonment, and all other facts, matters, and things which will be of importance to the board, and also file his or her cost bill.

[ 2009 c 549 s 4139; 1963 c 4 s 36.87.040. Prior: 1937 c 187 s 50; RRS s 6450-50.]